Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB823.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1408(c) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1408. Transfers from State Gaming Fund.* * *(c) Local law enforcement grants.--Except as provided in subsection (c.1), annually, the sum of $2,000,000 shall be transferred to the board for the purpose of issuing grants to local law enforcement agencies to investigate violations of and enforce laws relating to unlawful gambling in this Commonwealth. In addition to any other permissible use, grants under this subsection may be used to investigate and enforce violations of 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, 1234567891011121314151617 etc.), 5543 (relating to animal fighting) and 5544 (relating to possession of animal fighting paraphernalia). For purposes of this subsection, the term "local law enforcement agency" shall include the Pennsylvania State Police when conducting unlawful gambling enforcement and prevention activities in a municipality which does not have a municipal police department and in which the Pennsylvania State Police provide the municipality with primary police coverage.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0823PN0948 - 2 - 12345678910